Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB178.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 13A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Applicable environmental requirement" means an environmental
requirement or regulatory standard imposed by an administrative regulation
or proposed amendment to an existing administrative regulation
promulgated under the statutory authority of KRS Chapter 39E, 109, 146,
151, 211, 224, or 350;
(b) "Best available science" means science that:
1. Is reliable, unbiased, subject to independent verification, and applies
to the administrative regulation;
2. Maximizes the quality, objectivity, relevance, completeness, and
integrity of information, including:
a. Statistical information;
b. Human, animal, and other relevant scientific studies; and
c. If applicable, human health risk-based assessments; and
3. Involves the use of scientifically defensible quality-assured supporting
studies conducted in accordance with generally accepted scientific or
technical practices utilizing data collected by generally accepted
methods or best available methods that are:
a. Site-specific studies, including areawide or statewide studies;
b. Studies published in a refereed journal; or
c. External peer-reviewed studies contained in a federal
government report published for a purpose other than
development of an administrative regulation;
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/9/2026 3:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1998
(c) "Generally accepted scientific or technical practices" means scientific
methods, principles, or protocols that:
1. Are broadly acknowledged and routinely applied by the relevant
scientific community;
2. Are consistent with refereed journal literature or established technical
standards; and
3. Have been tested for reliability and validity;
(d) "Manifest bodily harm" means a physical disease or injury that is:
1. Presently existing and diagnosable;
2. Not based solely on the presence or detection of a substance in the
human body; and
3. Not based solely on an increased risk of disease;
(e) "Refereed journal" means a publication that:
1. Uses an editorial board or critical review panel of subject-matter
experts in the relevant scientific or technical disciplines who critically
and objectively assess the methodology and analysis of submitted
scientific studies in a nonpartisan fashion and provide editorial
services prior to publication; and
2. Takes meaningful steps to avoid biases in its scientific review process;
and
(f) "Weight of scientific evidence" means an approach to scientific evaluation
in which each piece of relevant information is considered based on its
quality and relevance, which, at a minimum, shall include consideration of
study design, fitness for purpose, replicability, peer review, and
transparency and reliability of data, and is then transparently integrated
with other relevant information to inform the scientific evaluation prior to
making a judgment about the scientific evaluation.
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/9/2026 3:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1998
(2) (a) Any administrative regulation related to setting an applicable
environmental requirement shall not be more stringent or extensive in
scope, coverage, or effect than any federal law or regulation regarding the
same or a substantially similar topic.
(b) In the absence of a federal law or regulation regarding the same or a
substantially similar topic, any administrative regulation setting an
applicable environmental requirement shall not be proposed or promulgated
unless all scientific and technical information relied on to support the
administrative regulation is based upon the best available science and the
weight of scientific evidence, and the administrative regulation is
technologically achievable at an applicable scale.
(c) For any administrative regulation relating to an applicable environmental
requirement subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection that is proposed or
promulgated by an agency to protect human health, safety, or welfare, the
following additional requirements shall apply:
1. The best available science and the weight of scientific evidence shall
establish a direct causal link between exposure at or above any
standards set forth in the administrative regulation and manifest
bodily harm in humans based on generally accepted scientific or
technical practices; and
2. In the absence of data from voluntary scientific studies on humans,
the best available science and the weight of scientific evidence may be
based on tests performed on experimental animal species or human
and animal cells establishing a direct causal link, based on generally
accepted scientific or technical practices, between exposure at or
above any standards set forth in the administrative regulation and
manifest bodily harm in humans, provided the harm can be
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/9/2026 3:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1998
extrapolated to humans based upon the best available science and the
weight of scientific evidence.
(3) This section shall not apply to:
(a) Any administrative regulation that is required by federal law or regulation,
including but not limited to administrative regulations promulgated to
comply with, and in furtherance of, federal agency authorization or primacy
requirements;
(b) Any administrative regulation that is less stringent or less extensive in
scope, coverage, or effect than any federal law or regulation setting an
applicable environmental requirement on the same or a substantially
similar topic or any administrative regulation that is substantively
equivalent to a federal law or regulation;
(c) Any administrative regulation that would repeal, pursuant to KRS 13A.310,
or amend an existing administrative regulation to render it less stringent or
less extensive in scope, coverage, or effect; or
(d) Any emergency administrative regulation.
(4) This section shall not be construed to replace, conflict with, or otherwise render
inapplicable any other provision of this chapter.
(5) This section applies to any administrative regulation that is proposed or adopted
on or after the effective date of this Act.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/9/2026 3:28 PM Jacketed